Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Chapter 2 Legislative Districts of Members

1991 reapportionment provisions unconstitutional. —

The 1991 Wyoming Legislative Reapportionment Act (former §§

28-2-112

through 28-2-114), insofar as it provided for representation in the state house of representatives and senate, constituted an invidious discrimination and violated the equal protection clause of the fourteenth amendment to the constitution of the United States.Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

1992 Apportionment Act constitutional. —

The Wyoming Legislature's “new” apportionment plan (1992 Apportionment Act), enacted in response to the supreme court's holding that the 1991 Legislative Reapportionment Act was unconstitutional, complies with the constitutional guidelines of the equal protection clause of the fourteenth amendment to make substantial population equality the legislature's overriding objective. Gorin v. Karpan, 788 F. Supp. 1199, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11920 (D. Wyo. 1992).

Legislative apportionment constitutional provision may be disregarded. —

Art. III, § 3, Wyo. Const., which constitutes each county an election district and requires that each county be represented by at least one representative, is inconsistent with the application of the “one person, one vote” principle under circumstances as they presently exist in Wyoming. Consequently, the Wyoming legislature may disregard this provision when reapportioning either the senate or the house of representatives. Gorin v. Karpan, 775 F. Supp. 1430, 1991 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14885 (D. Wyo. 1991).

§§ 28-2-101 through 28-2-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 76, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to apportionment, see §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

28-2-101

through 28-2-107, which were derived from Laws 1921, ch. 91, §§ 1 through 3, and Laws 1971, ch. 161, §§ 4 through 7, related to apportionment of members.

§§ 28-2-108 through 28-2-111.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 165, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Sections

28-2-108

through
28-2-111, which derived from Laws 1981, ch. 76, § 1, related to the apportionment of members.

§§ 28-2-112 through 28-2-114.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 1, § 7.

Cross references. —

As to the apportionment of members of the legislature, see §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 165, § 1, related to the apportionment of members.

§ 28-2-115.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 1, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1991, ch. 165, § 1, related to the legislative reapportionment oversight committee.

§ 28-2-116.
Legislative districts generally; definitions; legislative findings.

As used in W.S.

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

:

“Census block” means a geographic area of the state of Wyoming specified by the United States bureau of the census in accordance with the 2020 decennial census and identified uniquely by census block number;

“Voter tabulation district” or “VTD” means a geographic area of the state of Wyoming specified by the United States bureau of the census in accordance with the 2020 decennial census and identified by Wyoming VTD name and number;

“This act” means W.S.

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

.

As used in W.S.

28-2-118

and

28-2-119

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Blocks” designates the entire census block as numbered by the United States bureau of the census for the 2020 decennial census within the named VTD and county is a part of the legislative district;

“(Name of) County” designates either that the entire named Wyoming county is within the legislative district or that a portion of the named Wyoming county as specified is within the legislative district;

“District (number)” designates the legislative district number assigned to a house or senate legislative district from which a legislator is elected under this act;

“VTD” designates either that the entire voter tabulation district as named by the United States bureau of the census for the 2020 decennial census within the named county is a part of the legislative district or that a portion of the named voter tabulation district within the named county as specified is a part of the legislative district.

W.S.

28-2-118

creates legislative districts for the Wyoming senate and W.S.

28-2-119

creates legislative districts for the Wyoming house of representatives.

The secretary of state shall maintain and make available for public inspection in a hardcopy or electronic format, or both, during regular business hours:

The United States P.L. 94-171 data for the 2020 decennial census received by that office from the United States bureau of the census; and

The list and geographic description of the legislative districts for the Wyoming senate as printed in “Attachment B” as referenced in W.S. 28-2-119(c) and enacted into law and the list and geographic description of the legislative districts for the Wyoming house of representatives as printed in “Attachment A” referenced in W.S. 28-2-119(b) and enacted into law.

The legislature finds that:

The deviations in population between legislative districts in this act are required to recognize county boundaries, communities of interest, common economic interests and historical representative practices in Wyoming;

This act further recognizes the difficulties in representation caused by geographic boundaries and the rural nature of Wyoming;

This act keeps whole more political subdivisions than other redistricting plans considered by the Wyoming legislature;

Through keeping political subdivisions and communities of interest as whole as possible, this act provides for effective and efficient election administration;

The residents of Sheridan county school district number three are a community of interest with the residents of Johnson county through shared institutions and political history. The residents of Sheridan county school district number three typically conduct their business in Johnson county and have a shared economic interest with Johnson county. The residents of Sheridan county school district three have a shared educational interest with Johnson county. These connections and communities of interest between residents of Sheridan county school district three and Johnson county do not exist between the residents of Sheridan county school district three and Campbell county;

The factors listed in this subsection that create population deviations among legislative districts in this act are all legitimate considerations reasonably incident to the effectuation of a rational state policy.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 1; 2022 ch. 112, § 1, effective March 25, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8 § 1, repealed and recreated former

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 6, 2012.

Laws 2022, ch. 112, § 1, repealed and recreated former §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present
§§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 25, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

§ 28-2-117.
Effective date of changes in legislative districts; election of holdover senators.

Changes in all legislative districts are effective for the 2022 general election cycle and the sixty-seventh legislature.

Members for senate districts designated as odd-numbered districts in W.S. 28-2-118(b) shall be elected for a term of four (4) years at the 2022 general election. As provided in subsection (c) of this section, no election shall be held in 2022 for senate districts designated as even-numbered districts in W.S. 28-2-118(b) for which members were elected at the 2020 general election and nothing in this act shall affect the terms of those members. Members for senate districts designated as even-numbered districts in W.S. 28-2-118(b), shall be elected for a term of four (4) years at the 2024 general election.

A member elected in the 2020 general election for a senate district designated as an even-numbered district in W.S. 28-2-118(b) who has been removed from the district as a result of district boundary changes made by this act may continue to serve the remainder of the member’s term for the district from which the member was elected.

Nothing in this act otherwise affects the terms of members of the sixty-sixth legislature.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 1; 2022 ch. 112, § 1, effective March 25, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8 § 1, repealed and recreated former §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 6, 2012.

Laws 2022, ch. 112, § 1, repealed and recreated former §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present
§§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 25, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

§ 28-2-118.
Senate legislative districts; list of nested house districts formed to create senate districts.

Subsection (b) of this section creates legislative districts for the Wyoming senate consisting of the numbered legislative districts contained therein. There shall be one (1) senator elected from each legislative district as specified in subsection (b) of this section. If the senate district is listed with two (2) house districts in subsection (b) of this section, those senate districts shall consist of the entirety of the geographic area of the two (2) house districts listed in subsection (b) of this section for each senate district and as fully described in “Attachment A.” All senate districts are fully described in “Attachment B.”

Senate districts shall be organized as follows:

Senate District 1 — House Districts 1 and 52;

Senate District 2 — House Districts 6 and 62;

Senate District 3 — House Districts 2 and 5;

Senate Districts 4 — House Districts 7 and 8;

Senate District 5 — House Districts 12 and 42;

Senate District 6 — House Districts 4 and 10;

Senate District 7 — House Districts 9 and 41;

Senate District 8 — House Districts 11 and 44;

Senate District 9 - House Districts 13 and 45;

Senate District 10 — House Districts 14 and 46;

Senate District 11 — House Districts 15 and 47;

Senate District 12 — House Districts 17 and 48;

Senate District 13 — House Districts 39 and 60;

Senate District 14 — House Districts 18 and 20;

Senate District 15 — House Districts 19 and 49;

Senate District 16 — House Districts 21 and 22;

Senate District 17 — House Districts 16 and 23;

Senate District 18 — House Districts 24 and 50;

Senate District 19 — House Districts 25 and 26;

Senate District 20 — House Districts 27 and 28;

Senate District 21;

Senate District 22;

Senate District 23 — House Districts 3 and 31;

Senate District 24 — House Districts 32 and 53;

Senate District 25 — House Districts 33 and 54;

Senate District 26 — House Districts 34 and 55;

Senate District 27 — House Districts 35 and 36;

Senate District 28 — House Districts 56 and 57;

Senate District 29 — House Districts 37 and 59;

Senate District 30 — House Districts 38 and 58; and

Senate District 31 — House Districts 43 and 61.

See Attachment B.

Click to view

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 1; 2022 ch. 112, § 1, effective March 25, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8 § 1, repealed and recreated former §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 6, 2012.

Laws 2022, ch. 112, § 1, repealed and recreated former §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present
§§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 25, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

§ 28-2-119.
House legislative districts; lists of census blocks for split voter tabulation districts in the house of representatives.

Subsection (b) of this section creates legislative districts for the Wyoming house of representatives consisting of the numbered legislative districts contained therein. There shall be one (1) representative elected from each legislative district as specified in subsection (b) of this section. The area within a county, voter tabulation district or census block as provided in paragraphs (i) through (iii) of this subsection is determined using the United States bureau of the census topologically integrated geographic encoding and referencing data base (TIGER®). Each numbered legislative district in subsection (b) of this section consists of the combined geographic area within the:

Entire specified county, if the county alone is listed with no geographic subdivision listed below it;

Voter tabulation district, if any are listed below the specified county; and

Census block, if any are listed below the specified voter tabulation district. A census block listed below a voter tabulation district indicates a split voter tabulation district.

See Attachment A.

Click to view

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 1; 2022 ch. 112, § 1, effective March 25, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to publication and availability of Attachment A, referenced in subsection (b), see § 28-2-116(d).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8 § 1, repealed and recreated former §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 6, 2012.

Laws 2022, ch. 112, § 1, repealed and recreated former §§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

as present
§§

28-2-116

through

28-2-119

, effective March 25, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.